Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-711
Bylaws; make, alter, amend, or repeal; contents.

The power to make, alter, amend or repeal the bylaws of the corporation shall be vested in the board of directors. The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 11, p. 206;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-811;

R.S.1943, § 70-711.